Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.902

Existing rental agreements not affected.

All rental agreements entered into before June 9, 1988, and not automatically extended or automatically renewed after that date, or otherwise made subject to this chapter pursuant to RCW 19.150.901, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from them, shall remain valid, and may be enforced or terminated in accordance with their terms or as permitted by any other statute or law of this state.

[ 2008 c 61 s 5; 1988 c 240 s 17.]